Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1614
Research, defined.

Research means any type of study, investigation, or other activity performed by a qualified public or private research group for the purpose of advancing and improving the existing technology related to the propane industry, including the development of increased efficiency of propane use, of enhancing the safety of propane and propane utilization equipment, or of furthering the development of such information and products.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 14.